District of Columbia statutes.
10-221

Transfer of functions of Community Center and Playgrounds Department; transfer of unexpended funds.

All the functions of the Community Center and Playgrounds Department now under the joint control of the Mayor of the District of Columbia and the Board of Education are hereby transferred to and shall, after the effective date of this chapter, be vested in the said Recreation Board. The transfer of all such functions shall include transfer of the unexpended balance of the appropriation of the Community Center and Playgrounds Department, any unexpended balance in trust funds, and the salary of the coordinator now carried in the appropriation of the National Capital Parks.

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 264, ch. 265, art. III, § 1
1981 Ed., § 8-221.
1973 Ed., § 8-214.
The words “effective date of this chapter”, appearing near the end of the first sentence of this section, mean 30 days from the date of its approval.
Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of the Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.